Georgia statutes. 
TITLE 36

LOCAL GOVERNMENT

Provisions Applicable to Counties Only.

1. General Provisions, 36-1-1 through 36-1-27.

2. Militia Districts, 36-2-1 through 36-2-7.

3. County Boundaries, 36-3-1 through 36-3-27.

4. Change or Removal of County Site, 36-4-1 through 36-4-6.

5. Organization of County Government, 36-5-1 through 36-5-29.

6. County Treasurer, 36-6-1 through 36-6-28.

7. County Surveyor, 36-7-1 through 36-7-16.

8. County Police, 36-8-1 through 36-8-7.

9. County Property Generally, 36-9-1 through 36-9-11.

10. Public Works Contracts, 36-10-1 through 36-10-5.

11. Claims Against Counties, 36-11-1 through 36-11-7.

12. Supervision and Support of Paupers, 36-12-1 through 36-12-5.

13. Building, Electrical, and Other Codes, 36-13-1 through 36-13-12.

14. County Bridges, 36-14-1 through 36-14-3.

15. County Law Library, 36-15-1 through 36-15-13.

16. County Historical Container, 36-16-1 through 36-16-5.

17. Grants of State Funds to Counties, 36-17-1 through 36-17-25.

18. Regulation of Cable Television Systems, 36-18-1 through 36-18-5.

19. Immunity From Antitrust Liability, 36-19-1 and 36-19-2. [Redesignated].

20. County Leadership Training, 36-20-1 through 36-20-9.

21. Group Health Benefits Program, 36-21-1 through 36-21-10.

22. Land Conservation, 36-22-1 through 36-22-15. [Redesignated].

23 through 29. Reserved.

Provisions Applicable to Municipal Corporations Only.

30. General Provisions, 36-30-1 through 36-30-13.

31. Incorporation of Municipal Corporations, 36-31-1 through 36-31-12.

32. Municipal Courts, 36-32-1 through 36-32-41.

33. Liability of Municipal Corporations for Acts or Omissions, 36-33-1 through 36-33-6.

34. Powers of Municipal Corporations Generally, 36-34-1 through 36-34-8.

35. Home Rule Powers, 36-35-1 through 36-35-8.

36. Annexation of Territory, 36-36-1 through 36-36-119.

37. Acquisition and Disposition of Real and Personal Property Generally, 36-37-1 through 36-37-10.

38. Bonds, 36-38-1 through 36-38-23.

39. Street Improvements, 36-39-1 through 36-39-34.

40. Grants of State Funds to Municipal Corporations, 36-40-1 through 36-40-46.

41. Urban Residential Finance Authorities for Large Municipalities, 36-41-1 through 36-41-13.

42. Downtown Development Authorities, 36-42-1 through 36-42-17.

43. City Business Improvement Districts, 36-43-1 through 36-43-9.

44. Redevelopment Powers, 36-44-1 through 36-44-23.

45. Municipal Training, 36-45-1 through 36-45-20.

46 through 59. Reserved.

Provisions Applicable to Counties and Municipal Corporations.

60. General Provisions, 36-60-1 through 36-60-26.

61. Urban Redevelopment, 36-61-1 through 36-61-19.

62. Development Authorities, 36-62-1 through 36-62-14.

62A. Conduct of Members of Local Authorities, 36-62A-1 through 36-62A-22.

63. Resource Recovery Development Authorities, 36-63-1 through 36-63-11.

64. Recreation Systems, 36-64-1 through 36-64-15.

65. Immunity from Antitrust Liability, 36-65-1 through 36-65-2.

66. Zoning Procedures, 36-66-1 through 36-66-6.

66A. Transfer of Development Rights, 36-66A-1 through 36-66A-2.

66B. Mobile Broadband Infrastructure Leads to Development, 36-66B-1 through 36-66B-7.

66C. Streamlining Wireless Facilities and Antennas, 36-66C-1 through 36-66C-21.

67. Zoning Proposal Review Procedures, 36-67-1 through 36-67-6. [Repealed].

67A. Conflict of Interest in Zoning Actions, 36-67A-1 through 36-67A-6.

68. Merger of Municipal Government with County, 36-68-1 through 36-68-4.

69. Mutual Aid, 36-69-1 through 36-69-10.

69A. Interlocal Cooperation, 36-69A-1 through 36-69A-9.

70. Coordinated and Comprehensive Planning and Service Delivery by Counties and Municipalities, 36-70-1 through 36-70-28.

71. Development Impact Fees, 36-71-1 through 36-71-13.

72. Abandoned Cemeteries and Burial Grounds, 36-72-1 through 36-72-16.

73. Contracts for Regional Facilities, 36-73-1 through 36-73-4.

74. Local Government Code Enforcement Boards, 36-74-1 through 36-74-50.

75. War on Terrorism Local Assistance, 36-75-1 through 36-75-13.

76. Expedited Franchising of Cable and Video Services, 36-76-1 through 36-76-11.

77 through 79. Reserved.

Provisions Applicable to Counties, Municipal Corporations, and Other Governmental Entities.

80. General Provisions, 36-80-1 through 36-80-27.

81. Budgets and Audits, 36-81-1 through 36-81-20.

82. Bonds, 36-82-1 through 36-82-256.

83. Local Government Investment Pool, 36-83-1 through 36-83-8.

84. Purchasing Preferences, 36-84-1.

85. Interlocal Risk Management Agencies, 36-85-1 through 36-85-20.

86. Local Government Efficiency, 36-86-1 through 36-86-4.

87. Participation in Federal Programs, 36-87-1 through 36-87-2.

88. Enterprise Zones, 36-88-1 through 36-88-10.

89. Homeowner Tax Relief Grants, 36-89-1 through 36-89-6.

90. Local Government Cable Fair Competition, 36-90-1 through 36-90-8.

91. Public Works Bidding, 36-91-1 through 36-91-119.

92. Waiver of Immunity for Motor Vehicle Claims, 36-92-1 through 36-92-5.

93. Infrastructure Development Districts, 36-93-1 through 36-93-26. [Repealed], 36-93-1 through 36-93-26.

Annotations

Cross references. - Definition of term "county governing authority" as used in laws of state, § 1-3-3(7).

Establishment, powers, duties, and responsibilities of county board of health in each county of state, T. 31, C. 3.

Jurisdiction and authority of counties as to public roads generally, § 32-4-40 et seq.

Authority of counties to license roadhouses, public dance halls, and similar establishments, § 43-21-50 et seq.

Prohibition against requiring municipal or county officers or employees to reside within boundaries of municipality or county, § 45-2-5.

Purchase of liability insurance for members of municipal, county, or other governing bodies, § 45-9-20 et seq.

Contracts between counties and State Personnel Board relating to inclusion of county employees in health insurance plans established under T. 45, C. 18, A. 1.

County taxation generally, § 48-5-220 et seq.

Creation, powers, and duties of area planning and development commissions, § 50-8-30 et seq.

Law reviews. - For article, "The Use of the Police Power by Local Governments and Some Problems of Intergovernmental Relations," see 8 J. Pub. L. 109 (1959). For article, "Discretion in Georgia Local Government Law," see 8 Ga. L. Rev. 614 (1974). For article analyzing the changing relationship between state and local governments in Georgia in light of "Amendment 19," see 9 Ga. L. Rev. 757 (1975). For article, "Selected Oddities in Georgia Municipal Law," see 9 Ga. L. Rev. 783 (1975). For article discussing developments in Georgia's local government law in 1976 and 1977, see 29 Mercer L. Rev. 189 (1977). For article surveying Georgia cases in the area of local government law from June 1977 through May 1978, see 30 Mercer L. Rev. 133 (1978). For annual survey on local government law, see 36 Mercer L. Rev. 255 (1984). For article surveying local government law in 1984-1985, see 37 Mercer L. Rev. 313 (1985). For annual survey of local government law, see 39 Mercer L. Rev. 275 (1987). For annual survey of local government law, see 40 Mercer L. Rev. 303 (1988). For annual survey of local government law, see 42 Mercer L. Rev. 359 (1990). For annual survey of local government law, see 43 Mercer L. Rev. 317 (1991). For annual survey article on local government law, see 45 Mercer L. Rev. 325 (1993). For annual survey article on local government law, see 46 Mercer L. Rev. 363 (1994). For student article, "Georgia Local Government Law: Court Resolution of County Government Disagreements," see 46 Mercer L. Rev. 599 (1994).

For annual survey article on local government law, see 49 Mercer L. Rev. 215 (1997).

For annual survey article on local government law, see 50 Mercer L. Rev. 263 (1998). For annual survey article discussing local government law, see 51 Mercer L. Rev. 397 (1999). For annual survey article on local government law, see 52 Mercer L. Rev. 341 (2000). For article on cases in which the supreme court reversed the court of appeals on the subject of local government law, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2004).

——————————

PROVISIONS APPLICABLE TO COUNTIES ONLY

——————————

CHAPTER 1

GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec.

36-1-1. Names of counties.

36-1-2. Extent of jurisdiction of counties divided by water.

36-1-3. County a body corporate; power to sue and be sued generally.

36-1-4. When county liable to be sued.

36-1-5. Service upon county.

36-1-6. Publication of annual financial statement; contents.

36-1-7. Submission to grand jury of sworn returns of receipts and disbursements; approval or disapproval; appearance to explain errors; failure to make return.

36-1-8. Investment of certain tax proceeds in authorized bonds; registration of bonds.

36-1-9. Payment into county treasury.

36-1-10. Employment of accountant to examine books.

36-1-11. Additional temporary personnel and equipment for assistance of county officers or departments.

36-1-11.1. Expenditure of funds for insurance and employment benefits.

36-1-12. Courthouse to remain open during normal working hours.

36-1-13. Speculation in county orders by county officer.

36-1-14. Interested transactions prohibited; removal from office for violation.

36-1-15. Prohibition, regulation, and taxation of fortunetelling and similar practices.

36-1-16. Garbage, trash, waste, or refuse not to be transported across state or county boundaries for dumping without permission; exemption.

36-1-17. Authority of county employees to issue citations for violation of ordinances and regulations in counties having population of 550,000 or more; jurisdiction; effect of failure to respond.

36-1-18. Authority of counties having population of 550,000 or more to assess against cost of repairing streets as necessitated by private construction activity; liens.

36-1-19. Appropriation for charitable grants or contributions in counties having population greater than 550,000; establishment of boards or councils to devise procedures and advise governing authority [Repealed].

36-1-19.1. Appropriations for charitable grants or contributions in counties having population of 400,000 or more; boards or councils to establish procedures and advise governing authorities.

36-1-20. Ordinances for governing and policing of unincorporated areas of county.

36-1-21. Civil service system for county employees.

36-1-22. Business and occupational license taxes and fees [Repealed].

36-1-23. Purchase from county of materials used in the construction of water systems, sewer systems, storm and drainage systems, buildings, or other facilities.

36-1-24. Training classes for clerks of governing authority of county.

36-1-25. Official minutes of meetings.

36-1-26. Contracts for utility services; terms and conditions.

36-1-27. Referendum approval required prior to expenditure of public funds for establishment of fixed guideway transit; definitions; submission of the question to qualified voters; ballot language.

Annotations

Law reviews. - For annual survey of local government law, see 35 Mercer L. Rev. 233 (1983).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

ALR. - Liability to refund local taxes as within coverage of liability insurance, 21 A.L.R.4th 895.

36-1-1. Names of counties.

Statute text

The state is divided into 159 counties, whose boundaries and limits shall be ascertained by the several Acts laying off the same and those Acts amendatory thereof. The names of the counties are as follows: Appling, Atkinson, Bacon, Baker, Baldwin, Banks, Barrow, Bartow, Ben Hill, Berrien, Bibb, Bleckley, Brantley, Brooks, Bryan, Bulloch, Burke, Butts, Calhoun, Camden, Candler, Carroll, Catoosa, Charlton, Chatham, Chattahoochee, Chattooga, Cherokee, Clarke, Clay, Clayton, Clinch, Cobb, Coffee, Colquitt, Columbia, Cook, Coweta, Crawford, Crisp, Dade, Dawson, Decatur, DeKalb, Dodge, Dooly, Dougherty, Douglas, Early, Echols, Effingham, Elbert, Emanuel, Evans, Fannin, Fayette, Floyd, Forsyth, Franklin, Fulton, Gilmer, Glascock, Glynn, Gordon, Grady, Greene, Gwinnett, Habersham, Hall, Hancock, Haralson, Harris, Hart, Heard, Henry, Houston, Irwin, Jackson, Jasper, Jeff Davis, Jefferson, Jenkins, Johnson, Jones, Lamar, Lanier, Laurens, Lee, Liberty, Lincoln, Long, Lowndes, Lumpkin, Macon, Madison, Marion, McDuffie, McIntosh, Meriwether, Miller, Mitchell, Monroe, Montgomery, Morgan, Murray, Muscogee, Newton, Oconee, Oglethorpe, Paulding, Peach, Pickens, Pierce, Pike, Polk, Pulaski, Putnam, Quitman, Rabun, Randolph, Richmond, Rockdale, Schley, Screven, Seminole, Spalding, Stephens, Stewart, Sumter, Talbot, Taliaferro, Tattnall, Taylor, Telfair, Terrell, Thomas, Tift, Toombs, Towns, Treutlen, Troup, Turner, Twiggs, Union, Upson, Walker, Walton, Ware, Warren, Washington, Wayne, Webster, Wheeler, White, Whitfield, Wilcox, Wilkes, Wilkinson, and Worth.

History

(Orig. Code 1863, § 30; Code 1868, § 28; Code 1873, § 28; Code 1882, § 28; Civil Code 1895, § 29; Civil Code 1910, § 31; Code 1933, § 23-101.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Limitation of number of counties to 159, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. I, Para. II.

Prohibition of creation of new counties other than by consolidation or merger of existing counties, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. I, Para. II.

Editor's notes. - For laws creating counties, changing county boundaries or names, or otherwise affecting counties, see the Local Laws Index of this Code.

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in Bearden v. Baldwin, 174 Ga. 191, 162 S.E. 802 (1931).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

County name may be changed by statute. 1945-47 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 65.

36-1-2. Extent of jurisdiction of counties divided by water.

Statute text

Whenever a stream of water is the boundary of a county, the jurisdiction of the county shall extend to the center of the main channel of the stream, provided that whenever a stream of water is the boundary of a county and such stream or a bank thereof is the boundary of the State of Georgia, the jurisdiction of the county shall extend to that point which is the boundary of the state.

History

(Orig. Code 1863, § 39; Code 1868, § 37; Code 1873, § 35; Code 1882, § 35; Civil Code 1895, § 30; Civil Code 1910, § 32; Code 1933, § 23-102; Ga. L. 1984, p. 131, § 1.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Boundaries of counties generally, T. 36, C. 3.

Respective rights of owners of property divided by nonnavigable stream, § 44-8-2.

Boundaries of state generally, T. 50, C. 2.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 26.

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, §§ 22, 23.

36-1-3. County a body corporate; power to sue and be sued generally.

Statute text

Every county is a body corporate, with power to sue or be sued in any court.

History

(Orig. Code 1863, § 463; Code 1868, § 525; Code 1873, § 491; Code 1882, § 491; Civil Code 1895, § 340; Civil Code 1910, § 383; Code 1933, § 23-1501.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article, "Quasi-Municipal Tort Liability in Georgia," see 6 Mercer L. Rev. 287 (1955). For article, "Actions for Wrongful Death in Georgia: Part Three and Four," see 21 Ga. B. J. 339 (1959).

For note discussing governmental immunity from tort liability in Georgia, see 5 Ga. St. B. J. 494 (1969).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

ANALYSIS

General Consideration

Liability of Counties

Procedure

General Consideration

Extent of power conferred. - County, it is true, is a corporation. But this is only for certain specific purposes. Counties are, in fact, but quasi corporations, and this section of the Code is not to be understood as conferring any powers, except the right to sue and be sued, since the other powers are all conferred and regulated by other statutes and provisions of the Code. Millwood v. DeKalb County, 106 Ga. 743, 32 S.E. 577 (1899).

County is a body corporate and may sue and be sued, but the county's functions are government, and it has no power except as conferred by statute. Town of Decatur v. DeKalb County, 130 Ga. 483, 61 S.E. 23 (1908).

This section subjects the counties of this state to suit, but not to suits upon all causes of action. It does not make them generally liable to suits like individuals or as municipal corporations. Being political subdivisions of the state, they cannot be sued unless made subject to suit expressly or by necessary implication. Decatur County v. Praytor, Howton & Wood Contracting Co., 163 Ga. 929, 137 S.E. 247 (1927).

Who may sue. - Right to sue a county is not restricted to citizens of this state. Board of Comm'rs v. Hurd, 49 Ga. 462 (1873).

Construction with Code Section 36-1-4. - Former Code 1910, §§ 383 and 384 (see now O.C.G.A. §§ 36-1-3 and 36-1-4) must be construed together, and those statutes must receive a reasonable construction. Decatur County v. Praytor, Howton & Wood Contracting Co., 163 Ga. 929, 137 S.E. 247 (1927).

County's violation of constitutional right raises cause of action. - Violation by a county of a constitutional right of the citizen must, by necessary implication, raise a cause of action in favor of the citizen against the county, unless some means of redress other than suit has been afforded by the legislature. Tounsel v. State Hwy. Dep't, 180 Ga. 112, 178 S.E. 285 (1935).

Applicability of sovereign immunity in action between city and county. - In a suit by a city against a county, seeking a portion of tax revenue raised by the county from alcoholic beverage sales, there was a threshold question of whether sovereign immunity applied in suits between political subdivisions of the same sovereign (such as the city and the county), which the trial court had not addressed; therefore, remand was required. Clayton County v. City of College Park, 301 Ga. 653, 803 S.E.2d 63 (2017).

Judicial notice. - Courts will take judicial cognizance of the fact that each county is a body corporate. Taylor v. State, 123 Ga. 133, 51 S.E. 326 (1905).

Power to employ counsel. - County commissioners are authorized by clear implication to employ counsel for the county. Templeman v. Jeffries, 172 Ga. 895, 159 S.E. 248 (1931).

Action by county for enforcement not authorized. - County did not have authority to pursue tort damages based on the county's complaint alleging that unlawful acts by the defendants, including "occupation of buildings without obtaining inspections or certificates of occupancy, zoning violations, building code, safety, and fire violations, operation of businesses in a residential zone, and the like," caused the county to spend money enforcing the county's laws and protecting the county's citizens. Torres v. Putnam County, 246 Ga. App. 544, 541 S.E.2d 133 (2000).

Tort claims by county not authorized. - When a county had recovered, identified, and properly disposed of bodies found at a crematorium, O.C.G.A. § 36-1-3 did not authorize the county to recover the county's costs of doing so as compensatory damages in a tort action against the crematorium, funeral homes, and funeral directors alleging negligence and public nuisance claims. Walker County v. Tri-State Crematory, 284 Ga. App. 34, 643 S.E.2d 324 (2007).

Relation between the county and the county attorney does not rest upon contract, but arises from appointment authorized by a legislative enactment. Templeman v. Jeffries, 172 Ga. 895, 159 S.E. 248 (1931).

Cited in City of Dawson v. Terrell County, 38 Ga. App. 676, 145 S.E. 465 (1928); State Hwy. Bd. v. Hall, 193 Ga. 717, 20 S.E.2d 21 (1942); Ayers v. Franklin County, 73 Ga. App. 207, 36 S.E.2d 110 (1945); State Hwy. Dep't v. Parker, 75 Ga. App. 237, 43 S.E.2d 172 (1947); Norris v. Nixon, 78 Ga. App. 769, 52 S.E.2d 529 (1949); Arnold v. Walton, 205 Ga. 606, 54 S.E.2d 424 (1949); Stelling v. Richmond County, 81 Ga. App. 571, 59 S.E.2d 414 (1950); Banks County v. Stark, 88 Ga. App. 368, 77 S.E.2d 33 (1953); Seaboard Air Line R.R. v. County of Crisp, 280 F.2d 873 (5th Cir. 1960); Lowndes County v. Dasher, 229 Ga. 289, 191 S.E.2d 82 (1972); Bibb County v. McDaniel, 127 Ga. App. 129, 192 S.E.2d 544 (1972); Miree v. United States, 526 F.2d 679 (5th Cir. 1976); Georgia Insurers Insolvency Pool v. Elbert County, 258 Ga. 317, 368 S.E.2d 500 (1988); Manders v. Lee, 338 F.3d 1304 (11th Cir. 2003).

Liability of Counties

No right given to sue for any breach of duty. - This section does not ex vi termini give a citizen a right to sue the county for the nonperformance of any duty. A county rests upon a different footing from cities and towns. Scales v. Ordinary of Chattahoochee County, 41 Ga. 225 (1870).

Liability based on statute or breach of valid contract. - County can always be sued upon any liability against the county created by statute, or for breach of any valid contract which the county is authorized by law to make. Decatur County v. Praytor, Howton & Wood Contracting Co., 163 Ga. 929, 137 S.E. 247 (1927).

Supreme Court has long construed former Code 1933, §§ 23-1501 and 23-1502 (see now O.C.G.A. §§ 36-1-3 and 36-1-4) as permitting suits against counties based on contracts made pursuant to legislative authorization. PMS Constr. Co. v. DeKalb County, 243 Ga. 870, 257 S.E.2d 285 (1979).

County not liable without constitutional or statutory cause of action. - Constitutional provision that a county is a body corporate and this section do not authorize a suit against a county for damages when the county is not made liable for such damages by the Constitution or by statute. Revels v. Tift County, 235 Ga. 333, 219 S.E.2d 445 (1975).

Counties, as corporations, are mere subdivisions of the state, and the state is never subject to suit except by express enactment, and this is also true of subdivisions of the state. Tounsel v. State Hwy. Dep't, 180 Ga. 112, 178 S.E. 285 (1935).

County, being a political division of the state, is not liable to be sued, unless special authority can be shown; it is incumbent upon the person filing the suit to bring a case within the legislative authority upon which the person relies to bring the suit. Tounsel v. State Hwy. Dep't, 180 Ga. 112, 178 S.E. 285 (1935).

Whenever a county is by statute made liable for a given demand, an action against the county will lie therefor, though the statute does not in express terms authorize or provide for the bringing of such an action. Taylor v. Jenkins County, 116 Ga. App. 718, 158 S.E.2d 322 (1967).

County not liable for tort of guard. - County is not responsible in damages for the tort of a guard in unlawfully beating a convict in the chain gang, or for the negligence of other guards in not protecting the convict from the unlawful beating. Tounsel v. State Hwy. Dep't, 180 Ga. 112, 178 S.E. 285 (1935).

Procedure

Injunction available against governing officials. - Though suits by and against a county are properly brought in the name of the county, an injunction may be sought in a court of equity in an action which is brought against the governing officials of the county. Olley Valley Estates, Inc. v. Fussell, 232 Ga. 779, 208 S.E.2d 801 (1974).

All suits by, or against, a county shall be in the name thereof. Commissioners of Rds. & Revenue v. Howard, 59 Ga. App. 451, 1 S.E.2d 222 (1939).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, §§ 2, 8, 735, 740.

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, §§ 1 et seq., 410 et seq.

ALR. - County as subject to garnishment process, 60 A.L.R. 823.

Power of city, town, or county or its officials to compromise claim, 105 A.L.R. 170; 15 A.L.R.2d 1359.

Right of governmental entity to maintain action for defamation, 45 A.L.R.3d 1315.

36-1-4. When county liable to be sued.

Statute text

A county is not liable to suit for any cause of action unless made so by statute.

History

(Civil Code 1895, § 341; Civil Code 1910, § 384; Code 1933, § 23-1502.)

Annotations

History of section. - This Code section is derived in part from the decisions in Hammond v. County of Richmond, 72 Ga. 188 (1883), and Smith v. Wilkes & McDuffie Counties, 79 Ga. 125, 4 S.E. 20 (1887).

Law reviews. - For article, "Quasi-Municipal Tort Liability in Georgia," see 6 Mercer L. Rev. 287 (1955). For article, "Actions for Wrongful Death in Georgia: Parts Three and Four," see 21 Ga. B. J. 339 (1959). For article discussing necessity of liability insurance for Georgia counties and municipalities, and constitutional authority of the units to provide such insurance, see 25 Ga. B. J. 35 (1962). For article surveying tort liability insurance in Georgia local government law, see 24 Mercer L. Rev. 651 (1973). For article on insurance and indemnity for Georgia local government officers under Georgia law, see 13 Ga. L. Rev. 747 (1979). For survey article on local government law, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 225 (1982). For article, "Defending the Lawsuit: A First-Round Checklist," see 22 Ga. St. B. J. 24 (1985). For annual survey of local government law, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 289 (1986). For article, "Georgia Local Government Tort Liability: The 'Crisis' Conundrum," see 2 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 19 (1986). For article, "Georgia County Liability: Nuisance or Not?," see 43 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (1991). For article, "Local Government Tort Liability: The Summer of '92," see 9 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 405 (1993).

For note discussing governmental immunity from tort liability in Georgia, see 5 Ga. St. B. J. 494 (1969). For note analyzing sovereign immunity in this state and proposing implementation of a waiver scheme and creation of a court of claims pursuant to Ga. Const. 1976, Art. VI, Sec. V, Para. I, see 27 Emory L.J. 717 (1978).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

ANALYSIS

General Consideration

Violations of Constitutional Rights

Taking of or Damage to Private Property

Contracts

Torts

1. Liability Generally

2. Roads and Bridges

Pleading

General Consideration

Editor's notes. - In light of the similarity of the statutory provisions, decisions under former Code 1910, § 543 and former Code 1933, § 95-1001, are included in the annotations for this Code section.

Constitutionality. - This section does not violate the state and federal Constitutions. Revels v. Tift County, 235 Ga. 333, 219 S.E.2d 445 (1975).

This section does not violate U.S. Const., amend. 14 or Ga. Const. 1945, Art. I, Sec. I, Para. III (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. I, Sec. I, Para. I). Williams v. Georgia Power Co., 233 Ga. 517, 212 S.E.2d 348 (1975).

Codification of case law rule. - This section is a codification of the principal rule in Hammond v. County of Richmond, 72 Ga. 188 (1883), and Smith v. Wilkes & McDuffie Counties, 79 Ga. 125, 4 S.E. 20 (1887). Lynch v. Harris County, 188 Ga. 651, 4 S.E.2d 573 (1939).

Sovereign immunity still rule. - Supreme Court of this state has so often affirmed and acknowledged that the doctrine of sovereign immunity prevents a suit by a citizen against the state, or a political subdivision thereof, until it is hardly necessary to again formally assert this rule. Haber v. Fulton County, 124 Ga. App. 789, 186 S.E.2d 152 (1971), overruled on other grounds, Cox v. Cox ex rel. State Dep't of Human Resources, 255 Ga. 6, 334 S.E.2d 683 (1985).

Sovereign immunity recognized since common law. - Doctrine of sovereign immunity has been recognized in this state since the adoption of the common law. Hendon v. DeKalb County, 203 Ga. App. 750, 417 S.E.2d 705, cert. denied, 203 Ga. App. 906, 417 S.E.2d 705 (1992).

Applicability of sovereign immunity in suit between county and city. - In a suit by a city against a county, seeking a portion of tax revenue raised by the county from alcoholic beverage sales, there was a threshold question of whether sovereign immunity applied in suits between political subdivisions of the same sovereign (such as the city and the county), which the trial court had not addressed; therefore, remand was required. Clayton County v. City of College Park, 301 Ga. 653, 803 S.E.2d 63 (2017).

In a case involving taxation of alcoholic beverages, the city's claims against the county were not barred by sovereign immunity since the city and county were merely exercising their own respective home rule powers by collecting tax revenues for their own purposes, and neither was acting on behalf of the State of Georgia; thus, there was no sovereignty to be maintained. City of College Park v. Clayton County, 306 Ga. 301, 830 S.E.2d 179 (2019).

Immunity statutory, not common law. - Unlike the immunity of the state which had been judicially created, the immunity of a county from suit is found in statutory law. Nelson v. Spalding County, 249 Ga. 334, 290 S.E.2d 915 (1982).

Even if Ga. Const. 1976, Art. VI, Sec. V, Para. I (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. I, Sec. II, Para. IX) were not meant to reserve immunity for counties in all cases, such immunity has the additional support of O.C.G.A. § 36-1-4. Nelson v. Spalding County, 249 Ga. 334, 290 S.E.2d 915 (1982).

Extent of immunity. - Sovereign immunity enjoyed by a county extends to discretionary as well as ministerial functions and, indeed, even to personal injury claims based on nuisance. Early County v. Fincher, 184 Ga. App. 47, 360 S.E.2d 602, cert. denied, 184 Ga. App. 909, 360 S.E.2d 602 (1987).

Sovereign immunity barred the plaintiff's claims against the defendant county because, under O.C.G.A. § 36-1-4, a county was not liable to suit for any cause of action unless made so by statute, and the county's sovereign immunity had not been waived with respect to the claims asserted by the plaintiff. McRae v. Perry, F. Supp. 2d (S.D. Ga. Nov. 28, 2012).

O.C.G.A. § 36-1-4 includes actions brought under a theory of negligence. Schulze v. DeKalb County, 230 Ga. App. 305, 496 S.E.2d 273 (1998).

Language of section broad and comprehensive. - Language could not be broader or more comprehensive, or more free from doubt, than the words of this section. When it says the county shall not be liable for any cause of action, the statute expressly negatives the idea of exceptions other than provided therein, to wit, "unless made so by statute." Wood v. Floyd County, 161 Ga. 743, 131 S.E. 882 (1926).

General rule for liability. - Whenever a county is by statute made liable for a given demand, an action against the county will lie therefor, though the statute does not in express terms authorize or provide for the bringing of such an action. Decatur County v. Praytor, Howton & Wood Contracting Co., 163 Ga. 929, 137 S.E. 247 (1927).

Negligence not sufficient for action against county. - Neither negligent performance of duties which the county authorities are compelled to perform, nor the negligent discharge of duties voluntarily assumed, except in cases provided by statute, gives a cause of action against the county. Millwood v. DeKalb County, 106 Ga. 743, 32 S.E. 577 (1899); Mitchell County v. Dixon, 20 Ga. App. 21, 92 S.E. 405 (1917).

County exempt from suit generally. - This section has the effect of exempting a county from liability to suit in the absence of a statute authorizing a suit for the breach of duty alleged, though that duty is one imposed on the county by statute. Wolf v. Upson County, 44 F.2d 925 (5th Cir. 1930).

County is exempt from suit except when the suit is specifically authorized by the Constitution and statutes. Bibb County v. Green, 42 Ga. App. 552, 156 S.E. 745 (1931).

County is not liable to suit for any cause of action unless made so by statute. Hendon v. DeKalb County, 203 Ga. App. 750, 417 S.E.2d 705, cert. denied, 203 Ga. App. 906, 417 S.E.2d 705 (1992).

Medical care for inmates. - Trial court correctly determined that the state law claims made against a county and against a sheriff and medical contract compliance administrator in their official capacities were barred because, although O.C.G.A. § 42-5-2(a) imposed upon the county the duty and cost of medical care for inmates in the county's custody, the statute did not waive sovereign immunity of the county or the county's agents or employees. Graham v. Cobb County, 316 Ga. App. 738, 730 S.E.2d 439 (2012).

Counties, as corporations, are mere subdivisions of state, and the state is never suable except by express enactment, and this is also true of subdivisions of the state. Tounsel v. State Hwy. Dep't, 180 Ga. 112, 178 S.E. 285 (1935).

County, being a political division of the state, is not liable to be sued unless special authority can be shown; it is incumbent upon the person filing the suit to bring a case within the legislative authority upon which the person relies to bring the suit. Tounsel v. State Hwy. Dep't, 180 Ga. 112, 178 S.E. 285 (1935).

County in virtue of being a subdivision of the sovereign state "is not liable to suit for any cause of action unless made so by statute." For similar reason the State Highway Board (now State Transportation Board) is not so liable unless made so by law. Taylor v. Richmond County, 185 Ga. 610, 196 S.E. 37, answer conformed to, 57 Ga. App. 586, 196 S.E. 303 (1938).

Doctrine of sovereign immunity also applies to political subdivisions of the state, including counties. Hendon v. DeKalb County, 203 Ga. App. 750, 417 S.E.2d 705, cert. denied, 203 Ga. App. 906, 417 S.E.2d 705 (1992).

Rule for county liability different from that of city. - While it was true that the liability of cities on the cities' contracts was determined just as it was at common law and under former Code 1933, § 69-301 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-33-1) and their liability as to torts conforms to the rule at common law, the rule of liability as to counties was different, in that former Code 1933, § 23-1502 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-1-4) relaxed the rule which forbid altogether any suit against a county for any cause of action so as to authorize suits against the city when so authorized by express constitutional or statutory authority. Purser v. Dodge County, 188 Ga. 250, 3 S.E.2d 574, answer conformed to, 60 Ga. App. 316, 3 S.E.2d 744 (1939).

Express authorization of liability not necessary. - Whenever a county is by statute made liable for a given demand, an action against the county will lie therefor, though the statute does not in express terms authorize or provide for the bringing of such an action. Taylor v. Jenkins County, 116 Ga. App. 718, 158 S.E.2d 322 (1967).

Waiver of immunity. - Immunity provided to a county by O.C.G.A. § 36-1-4 is waived, pursuant to Ga. Const., 1983, Art. I, Sec. VI, Para. IX, when the county purchases a liability insurance policy. Early County v. Fincher, 184 Ga. App. 47, 360 S.E.2d 602, cert. denied, 184 Ga. App. 909, 360 S.E.2d 602 (1987).

No constitutional or statutory authority for recovery of punitive damages. - Since damages recoverable in an action by a property owner whose property is harmed by a county for public purposes is a substitute for damages recoverable in a condemnation action, there is no constitutional or statutory authority for the recovery of punitive damages against a county. Fulton County v. Baranan, 240 Ga. 837, 242 S.E.2d 617 (1978).

Without express authority by statute, county is not subject to garnishment. Dotterer v. Bowe, 84 Ga. 769, 11 S.E. 896 (1890).

When county officials exceed powers. - When public officers, in discharging duties imposed upon the officers by law, undertake other duties not imposed by law, although intending it to be a benefit to the public, the latter, as represented by county governments, cannot be made responsible for torts or ultra vires contracts. Wood v. Floyd County, 161 Ga. 743, 131 S.E. 882 (1926).

Acts done within scope of authority and without wilfulness, fraud, or malice. - Under sovereign immunity principles, a public officer or employee, acting within the scope of their authority and engaged in discretionary as opposed to ministerial functions, is entitled to immunity from suit provided the acts complained of are done within the scope of the officer's authority and without wilfulness, fraud, malice, or corruption. Hendon v. DeKalb County, 203 Ga. App. 750, 417 S.E.2d 705, cert. denied, 203 Ga. App. 906, 417 S.E.2d 705 (1992).

Board of education liable for acts outside board's authority. - County is a public corporation and acts through the county's officers and agents. In matters pertaining to education, the county acts through the county's board of education. When the board of education acts upon matters lawfully within the board's jurisdiction, the board is the county acting through the board's corporate authority, and a county is not liable to suit for any cause of action unless made so by statute. But when the board of education, through the board's members, acts beyond the scope of the board's lawful jurisdiction and commits an actionable wrong, the act so committed is not "county action," and in such a case a suit may be maintained in the courts of this state against the wrongdoers. Duffee v. Jones, 208 Ga. 639, 68 S.E.2d 699 (1952).

Charter provision constitutional. - A 1983 amendment to the charter of the consolidated local government of Columbus which provided that the tort liability of the consolidated government would be the tort liability applicable to counties was valid and constitutional. Bowen v. City of Columbus, 256 Ga. 462, 349 S.E.2d 740 (1986).

County is liable to suit in action to recover land owned by the plaintiffs and which has been taken possession of by the county, when the plaintiff refuses on demand to deliver possession. Lynch v. Harris County, 188 Ga. 651, 4 S.E.2d 573 (1939).

"Equitable liens." - O.C.G.A. § 36-1-4 was not an impediment to an unpaid subcontractor's "equitable lien" claim against a county as to any funds which were being held by the county but which belonged to the general contractor. DeKalb County v. J & A Pipeline Co., 263 Ga. 645, 437 S.E.2d 327 (1993).

County liable for money illegally received. - If a county illegally obtains the money of another and refuses, on demand, to make restitution, an action for money had and received lies against the county for money so appropriated and used. Owens v. Floyd County, 94 Ga. App. 532, 95 S.E.2d 389 (1956).

Suit for money had and received, when the suit is against equity and good conscience for the one receiving it to keep it (and this includes a county), is not based on a contract nor a statute. Owens v. Floyd County, 94 Ga. App. 532, 95 S.E.2d 389 (1956).

Requirement for writ of mandamus. - Before a writ of mandamus will issue to compel the county commissioners to issue a warrant upon the treasurer to pay a debt, it must appear that the debt comes within the classes provided in the Constitution for which a tax may be levied. Daniel v. Hutchinson, 169 Ga. 492, 150 S.E. 681 (1929).

When landowners were compensated by a county in condemnation proceedings, the landowners could not seek additional recovery based upon nuisance or trespass, nor could the landowners bring suit against the county for negligent misrepresentation or fraudulent inducement in the original condemnation actions. Butler v. Gwinnett County, 223 Ga. App. 703, 479 S.E.2d 11 (1996).

County's immunity regarding tax sale. - Pursuant to O.C.G.A. § 36-1-4 and Ga. Const. 1983, Art. I, Sec. II, Para. IX (e), a county was immune from a lender's suit because the lender pointed to no statute creating a waiver of immunity or any factual scenario warranting a waiver with respect to the lender's claim that the county failed to give the lender notice of the availability of excess funds following a tax sale as required by O.C.G.A. § 48-4-5. Bartow County v. S. Dev., III, L.P., 325 Ga. App. 879, 756 S.E.2d 11 (2014).
